Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.040

Pupils to comply with rules and regulations.

All pupils who attend the common schools shall comply with the rules and regulations established in pursuance of the law for the government of the schools, shall pursue the required course of studies, and shall submit to the authority of the teachers of such schools, subject to such disciplinary or other action as the local school officials shall determine.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.200. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 263 s 6; RRS s 4690; prior: 1897 c 118 s 69; 1890 p 372 s 48. Formerly RCW 28A.58.200, 28.58.200.]